District of Columbia statutes.
7-1303.14

Rules and regulations governing respite care.

(a)

The Department on Disability Services shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the provision of respite care for persons with intellectual disabilities. These shall provide that periods of respite care shall not exceed 42 days in a 12-month period without specific authorization by the Court after a hearing conducted in accordance with subchapter IV of this chapter.

(b)

Should any person be detained for respite care for a period exceeding 42 days in a 12-month period without specific authorization by the Court after a hearing conducted in accordance with subchapter IV of this chapter, he or she shall be promptly discharged.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 314, 25 DCR 5094
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 301(h), 54 DCR 818
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 26(i), 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 17(q), 59 DCR 5567

History

Mental health information, refusal or limitation on disclosures, see § 7-1202.06.
Rights of mentally retarded citizens, discharge following requests by parent, guardian or person committed, hearings, see § 7-1303.08.
Rights of mentally retarded citizens, effective date of chapter, see § 7-1306.05.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 6-1934.
1973 Ed., § 6-1667.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-264, in subsec. (a), substituted “Department on Disability Services” for “Department of Human Services”.
D.C. Law 16-305, in subsec. (a), substituted “persons with mental retardation” for “mentally retarded persons”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “intellectual disabilities” for “mental retardation” in the first sentence of (a).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 301(h) of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).

Emergency Legislation

The Department of Human Resources was replaced by the Department of Human Services pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, dated February 21, 1980.

References in Text

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

Editor's Notes